Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB667.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The ship on the official Commonwealth flag represents commerce from all over the world, and The Hershey Company, commonly known as Hershey's, offers its candy products for sale in approximately 85 countries.(2) Hershey's Kisses are one of the most iconic chocolate products ever created by Hershey's and one of the most recognized and beloved chocolate products around the world.(3) Each day, more than 70 million Hershey's Kisses are produced in Hershey, Dauphin County, which is the town where Milton Hershey was born.1234567891011121314151617 (4) Hershey's supports many aspects of this Commonwealth's economy, including supporting this Commonwealth's proud dairy industry for more than 125 years through the company's use of fresh dairy milk that surrounds the company's chocolate factories.(5) The Hershey Company is the largest United States chocolate manufacturer to use fresh fluid milk, sourced daily from a 100-mile radius of the company's headquarters in Hershey.(6) Hershey's Kisses are one of the most popular packaged candy products for Valentine's Day, which is a day when many residents of this Commonwealth express admiration by gifting Hershey's Kisses to their loved ones.(7) Since 1907, Hershey's Kisses are the original individually wrapped and portion-controlled chocolate confection, which allows consumers to enjoy the treat at any time.(8) The iconic foil wrapping symbolizes this Commonwealth's steel industry and the innovation of this Commonwealth's manufacturing industry, as each candy was hand wrapped until 1921 with the introduction of the first foil-wrapping machine.(9) The mission at Hershey's to "bring more moments of goodness to the world" has a positive impact on individuals and communities around the world.(10) The Hershey Company continues Milton Hershey's philanthropic legacy and belief that business is an act of service. The company invests millions in local communities and incentivizes employee volunteerism and charitable contributions.20250SB0667PN0842 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (11) Hershey's Kisses represent the official State nickname of the Commonwealth, "The Keystone State," because the candy's popularity acts as a keystone by providing thousands of family-sustaining jobs to residents of this Commonwealth.(12) The globally beloved legacy of Milton Hershey and the products he created transformed Hershey, Pennsylvania, into a tourist destination for visitors from around the world.(13) Hershey's Chocolate World draws over 3.2 million visitors from around the world each year, generates more than $200 million in local tourism and economic impact and is the world's most visited factory experience.(14) During the time when "kiss" was a common word for a small piece of candy in 1923, Mr. Hershey had the genius idea to trademark the term "Hershey's Milk Chocolate Kisses," which made the candy one of the most distinctive products recognized around the world and associated with this Commonwealth.(15) Today, there are many different varieties of Hershey's Kisses that satisfy a variety of different flavor preferences and expectations of consumers in this Commonwealth.(16) The Hershey Company has manufacturing facilities in the counties of Dauphin, Lancaster, Lebanon, Luzerne and Northampton, and the company continues to invest and expand in this Commonwealth by building and opening a new manufacturing facility in Hershey in 2025.Section 2. Official State candy.Hershey's Kisses are hereby designated as the official State 20250SB0667PN0842 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 candy of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, in perpetuity, and as long as The Hershey Company's address remains in the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.Section 3. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0667PN0842 - 4 - 12345